Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2748HV (1) 91 sc/js H.F. 939 Section 1. Section 6A.21, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Except as otherwise provided, for purposes of this 3 chapter and chapter 6B : 4 a. âAboveground merchant lineâ means âmerchant lineâ as 5 defined in section 478.6A, subsection 1 , excluding those 6 merchant lines that are underground. 7 b. âAgricultural landâ means real property owned by a person 8 in tracts of ten acres or more and not laid off into lots of 9 less than ten acres or divided by streets and alleys into 10 parcels of less than ten acres, and that has been used for 11 the production of agricultural commodities during three out 12 of the past five years. Such use of property includes, but 13 is not limited to, the raising, harvesting, handling, drying, 14 or storage of crops used for feed, food, seed, or fiber; the 15 care or feeding of livestock; the handling or transportation 16 of crops or livestock; the storage, treatment, or disposal 17 of livestock manure; and the application of fertilizers, 18 soil conditioners, pesticides, and herbicides on crops. 19 Agricultural land includes land on which is located farm 20 residences or outbuildings used for agricultural purposes and 21 land on which is located facilities, structures, or equipment 22 for agricultural purposes. Agricultural land includes 23 land taken out of agricultural production for purposes of 24 environmental protection or preservation. 25 c. âCommodityâ means a product that is used by an individual 26 consumer or is used to produce a product used by an individual 27 consumer. 28 d. âCommon carrierâ means a commercial enterprise that holds 29 itself out as ready to engage in the transportation of goods 30 or passengers for hire, as a public employment, and not as a 31 casual occupation, and that undertakes to carry for all persons 32 indifferently, within the limits of the enterpriseâs capacity 33 and the sphere of business required of it. For a carrier 34 engaged in the transportation of a hazardous liquid to qualify 35 -1- LSB 2748HV (1) 91 sc/js 1/ 4 H.F. 939 as a common carrier, the carrier must establish by clear and 1 convincing evidence that it will transport a commodity for 2 one or more shippers not affiliated with the carrier who 3 will either retain ownership of the commodity or sell the 4 commodity to a party other than the carrier. A common carrier 5 determination by the federal energy regulatory commission shall 6 be controlling for purposes of this paragraph. 7 c. e. âPrivate development purposesâ means the 8 construction of, or improvement related to, recreational 9 trails, recreational development paid for primarily with 10 private funds, aboveground merchant lines, housing and 11 residential development, or commercial or industrial enterprise 12 development. 13 d. f. âPublic useâ or âpublic purposeâ or âpublic 14 improvementâ does not include the authority to condemn 15 agricultural land for private development purposes unless the 16 owner of the agricultural land consents to the condemnation. 17 Sec. 2. Section 6A.24, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. Notwithstanding subsection 3, an 20 acquiring agency proposing to acquire property by eminent 21 domain pursuant to a grant under chapter 479B shall have the 22 burden of establishing by clear and convincing evidence that 23 the proposed use meets the definition of a public use, public 24 purpose, or public improvement. 25 Sec. 3. Section 479B.16, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 1. A pipeline company granted a pipeline permit shall , 28 subject to subsection 4, be vested with the right of eminent 29 domain, to the extent necessary and as prescribed and approved 30 by the commission, not exceeding seventy-five feet in width for 31 right-of-way and not exceeding one acre in any one location in 32 addition to right-of-way for the location of pumps, pressure 33 apparatus, or other stations or equipment necessary to the 34 proper operation of its pipeline. The commission may grant 35 -2- LSB 2748HV (1) 91 sc/js 2/ 4 H.F. 939 additional eminent domain rights where when the pipeline 1 company has presented sufficient evidence to adequately 2 demonstrate that a greater area is required for the proper 3 construction, operation, and maintenance of the pipeline or for 4 the location of pumps, pressure apparatus, or other stations or 5 equipment necessary to the proper operation of its pipeline. 6 Sec. 4. Section 479B.16, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. A pipeline company granted a pipeline 9 permit shall not be vested with the right of eminent domain 10 unless the pipeline company is a common carrier, as defined in 11 section 6A.21. 12 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 13 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 14 Sec. 6. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to condemnation 15 proceedings for which the application filed under section 6B.3 16 is filed on or after the effective date of this Act. 17